Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,377
Electric personal assistive mobility device; operation at nighttime.

When in use at nighttime, an electric personal assistive mobility device or the operator of an electric personal assistive device shall be equipped with a light visible from a distance of at least five hundred feet to the front on a clear night and with a red reflector on the rear of a type which is visible on a clear night from all distances between one hundred feet and six hundred feet to the rear when directly in front of lawful lower beams of headlights on a motor vehicle. A red light visible from a distance of five hundred feet to the rear may be used in addition to such red reflector.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 461.